Utah statutes.
76-3-207.5.   Applicability -- Effect on sentencing -- Options of offenders.

(1) (a)  The sentencing option of life without parole provided in Sections 76-3-201 and 76-3-207 applies only to those capital felonies for which the offender is sentenced on or after April 27, 1992.

(b)  The sentencing option of life without parole provided in Sections 76-3-201 and 76-3-207 has no effect on sentences imposed in capital cases prior to April 27, 1992.

(2)  An offender, who commits a capital felony prior to April 27, 1992, but is sentenced on or after April 27, 1992, shall be given the option, prior to a sentencing hearing pursuant to Section 76-3-207, to proceed either under the law which was in effect at the time the offense was committed or under the additional sentencing option of life in prison without parole provided in Sections 76-3-201 and 76-3-207.



Amended by Chapter 209, 2001 General Session

